src/scripts/Russian/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2012  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Conjunction 
а | 
ато | 
будто | 
дабы | 
если | 
зато | 
и | 
или | 
коли | 
либо | 
но | 
однако | 
пока | 
поскольку | 
притом | 
словно | 
также | 
то | 
хотя | 
чтоб | 
чтобы;

define Preposition 
без | 
безо | 
близ | 
в | 
вместо | 
во | 
возле | 
вокруг | 
вроде | 
для | 
до | 
за | 
засчёт | 
из | 
"из-за" | 
"из-под" | 
изо | 
к | 
ко | 
кроме | 
меж | 
между | 
мимо | 
на | 
над | 
напротив | 
насчёт | 
о | 
об | 
обо | 
около | 
от | 
ото | 
перед | 
передо | 
по | 
под | 
подо | 
помимо | 
после | 
пред |
предо |  
при | 
про | 
против | 
ради | 
с | 
сверх | 
сквозь | 
со | 
спустя | 
среди | 
у | 
через;

define Particle 
"-де" | 
"-ка" | 
"-либо" | 
"-нибудь" | 
"-с" | 
"-таки" | 
"-то" | 
аж | 
б | 
бишь | 
бы | 
ведь | 
вот | 
да | 
даже | 
дескать | 
ж | 
же | 
именно | 
ли | 
лишь | 
ль | 
не | 
ни | 
пусть | 
разве | 
таки | 
уж | 
хоть | 
это | 
якобы;

define Relative 
где | 
зачем | 
как | 
какая | 
какие | 
каким | 
каких | 
каков | 
какова | 
каково | 
какового | 
каковой | 
каковом | 
каковому | 
каковую | 
каковы | 
каковым | 
каковыми | 
каковых | 
какого | 
какое | 
какой | 
каком | 
какому | 
какую | 
кем | 
когда | 
кого | 
ком | 
кому | 
которая | 
которого | 
которое | 
которой | 
котором | 
которому | 
которую | 
которые | 
который | 
которым | 
которыми | 
которых | 
кто | 
куда | 
откуда | 
почему | 
сколько | 
чего | 
чей | 
чем | 
чему | 
что | 
чьего | 
чьей | 
чьему | 
чьи | 
чьим | 
чьим | 
чьими | 
чьих | 
чью | 
чья | 
чьё | 
чьём | 
чём;

define Personal 
вам | 
вами | 
вас | 
вы | 
его | 
ей | 
ему | 
ею | 
её | 
им | 
ими | 
их | 
меня | 
мне | 
мной | 
мною | 
мы | 
нам | 
нами | 
нас | 
него | 
ней | 
нему | 
нею | 
неё | 
ним | 
ними | 
них | 
нём | 
он | 
она | 
они | 
оно | 
тебе | 
тебя | 
тобой | 
тобою | 
ты | 
я;

define Possessive 
ваш | 
ваша | 
ваше  |  
вашего | 
вашей | 
вашем | 
вашему | 
вашею | 
ваши | 
вашим | 
вашими | 
ваших | 
вашу | 
моего | 
моей | 
моему | 
моею | 
мои | 
моим | 
моими | 
моих | 
мой | 
моя | 
моё | 
моём | 
наш | 
наша | 
наше  |  
нашего | 
нашей | 
нашем | 
нашему | 
нашею | 
наши | 
нашим | 
нашими | 
наших | 
нашу | 
своего | 
своей | 
своему | 
своею | 
свои | 
своим | 
своими | 
своих | 
свой | 
своя | 
своё | 
своём | 
твоего | 
твоей | 
твоему | 
твоею | 
твои | 
твоим | 
твоими | 
твоих | 
твой | 
твоя | 
твоё | 
твоём;

define FunctionWord Conjunction | Preposition | Particle | Relative | Personal | Possessive;

regex 
Conjunction -> conj || _ ,, 
Preposition -> prep || _ ,, 
Particle -> part || _ ,, 
Relative -> rel || _ ,, 
Personal -> pers || _ ,, 
Possessive -> pos || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ; 
